Florida, session 2026, SB418.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 31 32 Section 1.âSection 320.021, Florida Statutes, is created to 33 read: 34 320.021âBlue envelope and blue card program.â 35 (1)âThe department shall establish a blue envelope and blue 36 card program for the purpose of improving communication between 37 individuals with autism spectrum disorder and law enforcement 38 officers. 39 (2)(a)âBy January 1, 2027, the department shall develop and 40 make available to individuals with autism spectrum disorder a 41 blue envelope that is intended to hold a copy of an individualâs 42 driver license and his or her vehicle registration, proof of 43 insurance, and emergency contact information, and a blue card, 44 which envelope or card may be provided by an individual with 45 autism spectrum disorder to a law enforcement officer during an 46 interaction with the law enforcement officer. 47 (b)âThe exterior of the blue envelope must identify the 48 individual as an individual with autism spectrum disorder and 49 include communication guidelines intended to assist law 50 enforcement officers during interactions with drivers with 51 autism spectrum disorder. 52 (c)âThe blue card may be digital or a durable, wallet-sized 53 card and must identify the individual as an individual with 54 autism spectrum disorder and include communication guidelines 55 intended to assist law enforcement officers during interactions 56 with individuals with autism spectrum disorder. 57 (3)âBeginning January 1, 2027, an individual with autism 58 spectrum disorder may request a blue envelope, blue card, or 59 both a blue envelope and blue card from the department or a tax 60 collectorâs office. 61 Section 2.âSection 943.1727, Florida Statutes, is amended 62 to read: 63 943.1727âContinued Employment training relating to autism 64 spectrum disorder.â 65 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 66 (a)ââAgencyâ means the ability to make independent 67 decisions and act in oneâs own best interests. 68 (b)ââAutism spectrum disorderâ has the same meaning as in 69 s. 627.6686(2). 70 (2)âThe commission department shall establish an a 71 continued employment training component relating to individuals 72 with autism spectrum disorder as defined in s. 627.6686. The 73 training component shall include, but need not be limited to, 74 instruction on the recognition of the symptoms and 75 characteristics of an individual on the autism disorder spectrum 76 and appropriate responses to an individual exhibiting such 77 symptoms and characteristics. Completion of the training 78 component counts may count toward the 40 hours of instruction 79 for continued employment or appointment as a law enforcement 80 officer required under s. 943.135. 81 (3)âThe employment training component for law enforcement 82 officers which relates to interaction with individuals with 83 autism spectrum disorder must include in-person instruction for 84 initial certification and online instruction for continued 85 employment training or education required under s. 943.135(1) in 86 all of the following: 87 (a)âThe nature and manifestation of autism spectrum 88 disorder. 89 (b)âTechniques for interviewing or interrogating an 90 individual with autism spectrum disorder, including techniques 91 to ensure the legality of statements made by the individual and 92 techniques used to protect the rights of the individual. 93 (c)âTechniques for locating an individual with autism 94 spectrum disorder who has run away and is in danger and for 95 returning that individual while causing as little stress as 96 possible to the individual. 97 (d)âTechniques for recognizing the agency of an individual 98 with autism spectrum disorder while identifying potential 99 abusive or coercive situations. 100 (e)âTechniques for de-escalating a potentially dangerous 101 situation to maximize the safety of both the officer and the 102 individual with autism spectrum disorder. 103 (f)âTechniques for differentiating an individual with 104 autism spectrum disorder from an individual who is belligerent, 105 uncooperative, or otherwise displaying traits similar to the 106 characteristics of an individual with autism spectrum disorder 107 and for understanding the law as it relates to the use of the 108 Baker Act on an individual with autism spectrum disorder. 109 (g)âThe impact of an interaction with officers on 110 individuals with autism spectrum disorder. 111 (h)âInformation about the blue envelope and blue card 112 program established under s. 320.021 and the âSAFEâ designation 113 included in the motor vehicle record pursuant to s. 320.02(15). 114 (4)(a)âBy July 1, 2028, each basic skills course required 115 for law enforcement officers to obtain initial certification, as 116 required under s. 943.13(9), must incorporate such training 117 component. Such training component may be taught as part of 118 other relevant components of the training. 119 (b)âEach certified law enforcement officer must 120 successfully complete such training component as part of the 121 basic recruit training required under s. 943.13(9) or as part of 122 continued training or education required under s. 943.135(1) by 123 July 1, 2030. 124 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.